Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1152 Y 13
SFX 1152 cka čanski
SFX 1152 cka čanskog
SFX 1152 cka čanskoga
SFX 1152 cka čanskom
SFX 1152 cka čanskome
SFX 1152 cka čanskim
SFX 1152 cka čanskih
SFX 1152 cka čanskima
SFX 1152 cka čanske
SFX 1152 cka čanska
SFX 1152 cka čanskoj
SFX 1152 cka čansku
SFX 1152 cka čansko

SFX 1153 Y 13
SFX 1153 cija tinski
SFX 1153 cija tinskog
SFX 1153 cija tinskoga
SFX 1153 cija tinskom
SFX 1153 cija tinskome
SFX 1153 cija tinskim
SFX 1153 cija tinskih
SFX 1153 cija tinskima
SFX 1153 cija tinske
SFX 1153 cija tinska
SFX 1153 cija tinskoj
SFX 1153 cija tinsku
SFX 1153 cija tinsko

SFX 1154 Y 13
SFX 1154 o oljanski
SFX 1154 o oljanskog
SFX 1154 o oljanskoga
SFX 1154 o oljanskom
SFX 1154 o oljanskome
SFX 1154 o oljanskim
SFX 1154 o oljanskih
SFX 1154 o oljanskima
SFX 1154 o oljanske
SFX 1154 o oljanska
SFX 1154 o oljanskoj
SFX 1154 o oljansku
SFX 1154 o oljansko

SFX 1155 Y 13
SFX 1155 o olski
SFX 1155 o olskog
SFX 1155 o olskoga
SFX 1155 o olskom
SFX 1155 o olskome
SFX 1155 o olskim
SFX 1155 o olskih
SFX 1155 o olskima
SFX 1155 o olske
SFX 1155 o olska
SFX 1155 o olskoj
SFX 1155 o olsku
SFX 1155 o olsko

SFX 1156 Y 13
SFX 1156 ck čki
SFX 1156 ck čkog
SFX 1156 ck čkoga
SFX 1156 ck čkom
SFX 1156 ck čkome
SFX 1156 ck čkim
SFX 1156 ck čkih
SFX 1156 ck čkima
SFX 1156 ck čke
SFX 1156 ck čka
SFX 1156 ck čkoj
SFX 1156 ck čku
SFX 1156 ck čko

SFX 1157 Y 13
SFX 1157 nik ački
SFX 1157 nik ačkog
SFX 1157 nik ačkoga
SFX 1157 nik ačkom
SFX 1157 nik ačkome
SFX 1157 nik ačkim
SFX 1157 nik ačkih
SFX 1157 nik ačkima
SFX 1157 nik ačke
SFX 1157 nik ačka
SFX 1157 nik ačkoj
SFX 1157 nik ačku
SFX 1157 nik ačko

SFX 1158 Y 13
SFX 1158 ke ački
SFX 1158 ke ačkog
SFX 1158 ke ačkoga
SFX 1158 ke ačkom
SFX 1158 ke ačkome
SFX 1158 ke ačkim
SFX 1158 ke ačkih
SFX 1158 ke ačkima
SFX 1158 ke ačke
SFX 1158 ke ačka
SFX 1158 ke ačkoj
SFX 1158 ke ačku
SFX 1158 ke ačko

SFX 1159 Y 13
SFX 1159 e eanski
SFX 1159 e eanskog
SFX 1159 e eanskoga
SFX 1159 e eanskom
SFX 1159 e eanskome
SFX 1159 e eanskim
SFX 1159 e eanskih
SFX 1159 e eanskima
SFX 1159 e eanske
SFX 1159 e eanska
SFX 1159 e eanskoj
SFX 1159 e eansku
SFX 1159 e eansko

SFX 1160 Y 13
SFX 1160 ke čki
SFX 1160 ke čkog
SFX 1160 ke čkoga
SFX 1160 ke čkom
SFX 1160 ke čkome
SFX 1160 ke čkim
SFX 1160 ke čkih
SFX 1160 ke čkima
SFX 1160 ke čke
SFX 1160 ke čka
SFX 1160 ke čkoj
SFX 1160 ke čku
SFX 1160 ke čko

SFX 1161 Y 13
SFX 1161 o ački
SFX 1161 o ačkog
SFX 1161 o ačkoga
SFX 1161 o ačkom
SFX 1161 o ačkome
SFX 1161 o ačkim
SFX 1161 o ačkih
SFX 1161 o ačkima
SFX 1161 o ačke
SFX 1161 o ačka
SFX 1161 o ačkoj
SFX 1161 o ačku
SFX 1161 o ačko

SFX 1162 Y 13
SFX 1162 đ đski
SFX 1162 đ đskog
SFX 1162 đ đskoga
SFX 1162 đ đskom
SFX 1162 đ đskome
SFX 1162 đ đskim
SFX 1162 đ đskih
SFX 1162 đ đskima
SFX 1162 đ đske
SFX 1162 đ đska
SFX 1162 đ đskoj
SFX 1162 đ đsku
SFX 1162 đ đsko

SFX 1163 Y 13
SFX 1163 r ranski
SFX 1163 r ranskog
SFX 1163 r ranskoga
SFX 1163 r ranskom
SFX 1163 r ranskome
SFX 1163 r ranskim
SFX 1163 r ranskih
SFX 1163 r ranskima
SFX 1163 r ranske
SFX 1163 r ranska
SFX 1163 r ranskoj
SFX 1163 r ransku
SFX 1163 r ransko

SFX 1164 Y 13
SFX 1164 dž čki
SFX 1164 dž čkog
SFX 1164 dž čkoga
SFX 1164 dž čkom
SFX 1164 dž čkome
SFX 1164 dž čkim
SFX 1164 dž čkih
SFX 1164 dž čkima
SFX 1164 dž čke
SFX 1164 dž čka
SFX 1164 dž čkoj
SFX 1164 dž čku
SFX 1164 dž čko

SFX 1165 Y 13
SFX 1165 o oški
SFX 1165 o oškog
SFX 1165 o oškoga
SFX 1165 o oškom
SFX 1165 o oškome
SFX 1165 o oškim
SFX 1165 o oških
SFX 1165 o oškima
SFX 1165 o oške
SFX 1165 o oška
SFX 1165 o oškoj
SFX 1165 o ošku
SFX 1165 o oško

SFX 1166 Y 13
SFX 1166 a ki
SFX 1166 a kog
SFX 1166 a koga
SFX 1166 a kom
SFX 1166 a kome
SFX 1166 a kim
SFX 1166 a kih
SFX 1166 a kima
SFX 1166 a ke
SFX 1166 a ka
SFX 1166 a koj
SFX 1166 a ku
SFX 1166 a ko

SFX 1167 Y 13
SFX 1167 b bački
SFX 1167 b bačkog
SFX 1167 b bačkoga
SFX 1167 b bačkom
SFX 1167 b bačkome
SFX 1167 b bačkim
SFX 1167 b bačkih
SFX 1167 b bačkima
SFX 1167 b bačke
SFX 1167 b bačka
SFX 1167 b bačkoj
SFX 1167 b bačku
SFX 1167 b bačko

SFX 1168 Y 13
SFX 1168 ki ki
SFX 1168 ki kog
SFX 1168 ki koga
SFX 1168 ki kom
SFX 1168 ki kome
SFX 1168 ki kim
SFX 1168 ki kih
SFX 1168 ki kima
SFX 1168 ki ke
SFX 1168 ki ka
SFX 1168 ki koj
SFX 1168 ki ku
SFX 1168 ki ko

SFX 1169 Y 13
SFX 1169 zd žđanski
SFX 1169 zd žđanskog
SFX 1169 zd žđanskoga
SFX 1169 zd žđanskom
SFX 1169 zd žđanskome
SFX 1169 zd žđanskim
SFX 1169 zd žđanskih
SFX 1169 zd žđanskima
SFX 1169 zd žđanske
SFX 1169 zd žđanska
SFX 1169 zd žđanskoj
SFX 1169 zd žđansku
SFX 1169 zd žđansko

SFX 1170 Y 13
SFX 1170 zija žanski
SFX 1170 zija žanskog
SFX 1170 zija žanskoga
SFX 1170 zija žanskom
SFX 1170 zija žanskome
SFX 1170 zija žanskim
SFX 1170 zija žanskih
SFX 1170 zija žanskima
SFX 1170 zija žanske
SFX 1170 zija žanska
SFX 1170 zija žanskoj
SFX 1170 zija žansku
SFX 1170 zija žansko

SFX 1171 Y 13
SFX 1171 ka čanski
SFX 1171 ka čanskog
SFX 1171 ka čanskoga
SFX 1171 ka čanskom
SFX 1171 ka čanskome
SFX 1171 ka čanskim
SFX 1171 ka čanskih
SFX 1171 ka čanskima
SFX 1171 ka čanske
SFX 1171 ka čanska
SFX 1171 ka čanskoj
SFX 1171 ka čansku
SFX 1171 ka čansko

SFX 1172 Y 13
SFX 1172 a ljanski
SFX 1172 a ljanskog
SFX 1172 a ljanskoga
SFX 1172 a ljanskom
SFX 1172 a ljanskome
SFX 1172 a ljanskim
SFX 1172 a ljanskih
SFX 1172 a ljanskima
SFX 1172 a ljanske
SFX 1172 a ljanska
SFX 1172 a ljanskoj
SFX 1172 a ljansku
SFX 1172 a ljansko

SFX 1173 Y 13
SFX 1173 šje ki
SFX 1173 šje kog
SFX 1173 šje koga
SFX 1173 šje kom
SFX 1173 šje kome
SFX 1173 šje kim
SFX 1173 šje kih
SFX 1173 šje kima
SFX 1173 šje ke
SFX 1173 šje ka
SFX 1173 šje koj
SFX 1173 šje ku
SFX 1173 šje ko

SFX 1174 Y 13
SFX 1174 avija ovenski
SFX 1174 avija ovenskog
SFX 1174 avija ovenskoga
SFX 1174 avija ovenskom
SFX 1174 avija ovenskome
SFX 1174 avija ovenskim
SFX 1174 avija ovenskih
SFX 1174 avija ovenskima
SFX 1174 avija ovenske
SFX 1174 avija ovenska
SFX 1174 avija ovenskoj
SFX 1174 avija ovensku
SFX 1174 avija ovensko

SFX 1175 Y 13
SFX 1175 dž džanski
SFX 1175 dž džanskog
SFX 1175 dž džanskoga
SFX 1175 dž džanskom
SFX 1175 dž džanskome
SFX 1175 dž džanskim
SFX 1175 dž džanskih
SFX 1175 dž džanskima
SFX 1175 dž džanske
SFX 1175 dž džanska
SFX 1175 dž džanskoj
SFX 1175 dž džansku
SFX 1175 dž džansko

SFX 1176 Y 13
SFX 1176 bi pski
SFX 1176 bi pskog
SFX 1176 bi pskoga
SFX 1176 bi pskom
SFX 1176 bi pskome
SFX 1176 bi pskim
SFX 1176 bi pskih
SFX 1176 bi pskima
SFX 1176 bi pske
SFX 1176 bi pska
SFX 1176 bi pskoj
SFX 1176 bi psku
SFX 1176 bi psko

SFX 1177 Y 13
SFX 1177 e eški
SFX 1177 e eškog
SFX 1177 e eškoga
SFX 1177 e eškom
SFX 1177 e eškome
SFX 1177 e eškim
SFX 1177 e eških
SFX 1177 e eškima
SFX 1177 e eške
SFX 1177 e eška
SFX 1177 e eškoj
SFX 1177 e ešku
SFX 1177 e eško

SFX 1178 Y 13
SFX 1178 u ujski
SFX 1178 u ujskog
SFX 1178 u ujskoga
SFX 1178 u ujskom
SFX 1178 u ujskome
SFX 1178 u ujskim
SFX 1178 u ujskih
SFX 1178 u ujskima
SFX 1178 u ujske
SFX 1178 u ujska
SFX 1178 u ujskoj
SFX 1178 u ujsku
SFX 1178 u ujsko

SFX 1179 Y 13
SFX 1179 a eski
SFX 1179 a eskog
SFX 1179 a eskoga
SFX 1179 a eskom
SFX 1179 a eskome
SFX 1179 a eskim
SFX 1179 a eskih
SFX 1179 a eskima
SFX 1179 a eske
SFX 1179 a eska
SFX 1179 a eskoj
SFX 1179 a esku
SFX 1179 a esko

SFX 1180 Y 13
SFX 1180 zija ški
SFX 1180 zija škog
SFX 1180 zija škoga
SFX 1180 zija škom
SFX 1180 zija škome
SFX 1180 zija škim
SFX 1180 zija ških
SFX 1180 zija škima
SFX 1180 zija ške
SFX 1180 zija ška
SFX 1180 zija škoj
SFX 1180 zija šku
SFX 1180 zija ško

SFX 1181 Y 13
SFX 1181 le lanski
SFX 1181 le lanskog
SFX 1181 le lanskoga
SFX 1181 le lanskom
SFX 1181 le lanskome
SFX 1181 le lanskim
SFX 1181 le lanskih
SFX 1181 le lanskima
SFX 1181 le lanske
SFX 1181 le lanska
SFX 1181 le lanskoj
SFX 1181 le lansku
SFX 1181 le lansko

SFX 1182 Y 13
SFX 1182 he ški
SFX 1182 he škog
SFX 1182 he škoga
SFX 1182 he škom
SFX 1182 he škome
SFX 1182 he škim
SFX 1182 he ških
SFX 1182 he škima
SFX 1182 he ške
SFX 1182 he ška
SFX 1182 he škoj
SFX 1182 he šku
SFX 1182 he ško
